tur-verb.xfst
clear

define C  b|c|ç|d|f|g|ğ|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|r|s|ş|t|v|y|z;

define V  a|e|i|o|u|ü|ö|ı;

define VAbs H|I|A;

define CAbs S|D|Y;

define +HIGH i|u|ı|ü; 
define -HIGH e|a|o|ö;
define +LOW a|ö;
define -LOW e|i|ı|o|u|ü;
define +BACK ı|a|o|u;
define -BACK i|e|ö|ü;
define +ROUND ö|ü|o|u;
define -ROUND e|a|i|ı;

define -VOICE p|ç|t|k|f|s|ş|h;

! To handle t/d variation.

define DRule        D -> t || %-VOICE "^" _ ,, D -> d || \%-VOICE "^" _ ;

! To handle double vowel conflict such as geldiyse(ı)nız, görülm(e)üyor etc.

define VReduction   	H -> 0 || [m|d] _ "^" H , s [e|a] "^" _ ,,
                    	[a|e] -> 0 || m _ "^" H ; 


! To handle Vowel Harmony.

define HRule  		H -> %+HIGH & %+ROUND & %+BACK || [%+BACK & %+ROUND] \V* _ ,,
         		H -> %+HIGH & %+ROUND & %-BACK || [%-BACK & %+ROUND] \V* _ ,,
          		H -> %+HIGH & %-ROUND & %+BACK || [%+BACK & %-ROUND] \V* _ ,,
          		H -> %+HIGH & %-ROUND & %-BACK || [%-BACK & %-ROUND] \V* _ ;

! To handle e/a variation.

define ARule  		A -> %-HIGH & %-ROUND & %+BACK || %+BACK \V* _ ,,
			A -> %-HIGH & %-ROUND & %-BACK || %-BACK \V* _ ;

! To handle ı/i variation.

define IRule    I -> ı || a \V* _ ,, I -> i || e \V* _ ;

! To handle "s" in kaçtıysa(s)ınız, yap(s)ınlar.

define SRule    S -> 0 || H "^" _ ,, S -> s || \H "^" _ ;

! To handle Y in ağlaYınız or yapsaYdın etc.
    
define YRule    Y -> y || V "^" _ V ,, Y -> 0 || C "^" _ ;

! To handle Consonant Change.

define ConsChange   k -> ğ || _ "^" V ;

! To eliminate negative aorist gelme(z)m conflict.

define Zclear   Z -> 0 || _ "^" [m|y] ,, Z -> z || _ "^" \[m|y] ; 

! Clear out the "^" symbols.

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

push Cleanup
push Zclear
push ConsChange
push HRule
push VReduction
push YRule
push SRule
push DRule
push IRule
push ARule
read lexc tur-verb.lexc
compose net
